New York, session 2025-2026, S3451.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (d) of subdivision 7 of section 76-a of the alco- 2 holic beverage control law, as amended by chapter 571 of the laws of 3 2008 and as renumbered by chapter 231 of the laws of 2024, is amended to 4 read as follows: 5 (d) Deliver or transport any New York state labelled wine manufactured 6 or produced by the licensee or any other winery or farm winery licensed 7 pursuant to this article in any vehicle that is owned, leased or hired 8 by the licensee, and/or owned by any employee of the licensee provided 9 that such employee consents to such use of their vehicle. The New York 10 state labelled wine can be delivered, transported or sold by the licen- 11 see to any holder of: (i) a winery or farm winery license, (ii) a 12 license to sell alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises, 13 (iii) a license to sell alcoholic beverages for consumption off the 14 premises, (iv) or any person that can receive or purchase wine from a 15 farm winery. [The] Neither the licensee [is not] nor any of its employ- 16 ees shall be required to obtain from the liquor authority a trucking 17 permit or pay any fees pursuant to section ninety-four of this chapter. 18 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07207-01-5